Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2503
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Controlled Substances Animal Welfare Act:

(1) Animal welfare organization means a Nebraska nonprofit corporation whose purpose is promoting the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of animals, and whose activities may include the seizure, impoundment, boarding, or kenneling of stray, injured, sick, homeless, abandoned, or unwanted animals;

(2) Euthanizing drug means sodium pentobarbital or any controlled substance used for the purpose of humane euthanasia of seized, stray, injured, sick, homeless, abandoned, or unwanted animals; and

(3) Veterinarian means a person authorized by law to practice veterinary medicine in this state.

Laws 1999, LB 573, § 3.